Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.53.100

Acquisition of control of state trust company—Disapproval by director—Change of officers.

(1) The director may disapprove the acquisition of a state trust company within thirty days after the filing of a complete application pursuant to RCW 30B.53.090 or an extended period not exceeding an additional fifteen days if:

(a) The poor financial condition of any acquiring person might jeopardize the financial stability of the state trust company or might prejudice the interests of the state trust company's shareholders or the trustors or beneficiaries of trusts in which the state trust company is a trustee or investment advisor;

(b) The plan or proposal of the acquiring person to liquidate the state trust company, to sell its assets or transfer its fiduciary assets, to merge it with any person, or to make any other major change in its business or corporate structure or management that is not fair and reasonable to the state trust company's shareholders or the trustors or beneficiaries of trusts in which the state trust company is a trustee or investment advisor;

(c) The fiduciary and other business experience and integrity of any acquiring person who would control the operation of the state trust company indicates that approval would not be in the interest of the state trust company's shareholders or the trustors or beneficiaries of trusts in which the state trust company is a trustee or investment advisor;

(d) The information provided by the application is insufficient for the director to make a determination or there has been insufficient time to verify the information provided and conduct an examination of the qualification of the acquiring person; or

(e) The acquisition would not be in the public interest.

(2) An acquisition may be made prior to expiration of the disapproval period if the director issues written notice of intent not to disapprove the action.

(3) The director shall set forth the basis for disapproval of any proposed acquisition in writing and shall provide a copy of such findings and order to the applicants and to the state trust company involved. Such findings and order shall not be disclosed to any other person and shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW unless the findings or order are appealed pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4) Whenever such a change of control occurs, each party to the transaction shall report promptly to the director any changes or replacement of its chief executive officer, managers, or any director, which occurs in the following twelve-month period, including in its report a statement of the past and present business and professional affiliations of the new chief executive officer, managers, or directors.

[ 2019 c 389 s 95.]